Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7513.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-20.8 of the General Laws entitled "Real Estate Sales Disclosures"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-20.8-14. Radon inspection and mitigation required.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings, unless
the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Radon" means a radioactive gas found in the air that comes from the natural
breakdown of uranium, thorium, or radium in soil, rock, and water.
(2) "Radon test" means measuring the amount of radon in an indoor space:
(i) With a device made for this purpose;
(ii) Which is conducted by a certified or licensed individual in accordance with § 23-61-5;
and
(iii) In accordance with the protocols specified for the device used.
(3) "Residential real estate transaction" means an agreement to sell real property for
residential purposes including, but not limited to, single family homes, duplexes, multi-family
homes, and apartment complexes. "Residential real estate transaction" does not include property
sold for non-residential commercial property, or property used for tourist or transient residential
purposes as defined in § 42-63.1-2.
(4) "Unsafe radon levels" means radon levels that exceed the Environmental Protection

Agency action level of 4.0 picocuries per liter (pCi/L).
(b) Transactions that do not require radon testing.
(1) The following transactions shall not be considered a residential real estate transaction,
and shall not require a radon test if the transaction is:
(i) By a lender or an affiliate or subsidiary lender that acquired the home by foreclosure or
deed in lieu of foreclosure;
(ii) A sheriff’s sale, tax sale, or sale by foreclosure, partition, or by court appointed trustee;
(iii) A transfer of a home to be converted by the buyer into a use other than residential or
to be demolished; or
(iv) A devise pursuant to a will or an intestate inheritance.
(2) A residential real estate transaction property that has an existing radon mitigation
system installed by a licensed radon contractor within three (3) years of the execution of the
purchase and sale agreement; or
(3) A residential real estate transaction property that has an existing radon mitigation
system installed by a licensed radon contractor mare than three (3) years prior to the execution of
the purchase and sale agreement but has been tested for radon within three (3) years of the execution
of the purchase and sales agreement.
(c) Mandatory radon testing and disclosure.
(1) Any purchase and sale agreement executed on June 1, 2027 and thereafter, as a
prerequisite to a residential real estate transaction not covered in subsection (b) of this section, a
radon test shall be performed no earlier than one year prior to the closing date of the residential real
estate transaction.
(2) The results of any radon test performed up to one year prior to the closing shall be made
available to the selling and buying parties of the transaction, as well as any lender designated by
the buying parties.
(d) Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, the buyer shall bear the burden of covering
the cost of the radon test if it is completed after the execution of the purchase and sale agreement
and the seller provided no certified test completed within one year prior to the execution of the
purchase and sale agreement indication no unsafe radon level.
(e) Mitigation required. In the event that a radon test conducted in accordance with this
section yields a result indicating unsafe radon levels, a radon mitigation system shall be installed,
by a certified or licensed individual in accordance with § 23-61-5, prior to the closing of the
residential real estate transaction, if possible. In the event it is not possible to complete the work
prior to the closing, the estimated amount of the cost of the mitigation system shall be held in
LC004923/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 4

escrow until the work is completed at which time the amount in escrow shall be distributed in
accordance with an agreement signed by the seller and buyer to the closing.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on June 1, 2027.
========
LC004923/SUB A/2
========
LC004923/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 4